District of Columbia statutes.
29-412.01

Dissolution by incorporators or directors.

A majority of the incorporators or directors of a nonprofit corporation that has not commenced activity, or of a membership corporation that has not admitted any members, may dissolve the corporation by delivering to the Mayor for filing articles of dissolution that set forth:

(1)

The name of the corporation;

(2)

The date of its incorporation;

(3)

(A)

That the corporation has not commenced activity; or

(B)

That the corporation is a membership corporation and has not admitted any members;

(4)

That no debt of the corporation remains unpaid;

(5)

That, except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, the net assets of the corporation remaining after winding up have been distributed to the members, if members were admitted; and

(6)

That a majority of the incorporators or directors authorized the dissolution.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History